Ohio, session 136, HB802.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 5534.456 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 5534.456. In addition to any other name prescribed in the Revised Code or otherwise, the eastbound and westbound lanes of United States route number twenty between Hubbard road and county line road, within Lake county, shall be known as the "Patrolman Karl E. Bushong Memorial Highway." The director of transportation may erect suitable markers along the highway indicating its name.